Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.52.370

Certificates of election to other officers.

Except as provided in the state Constitution, the governor shall issue certificates of election to those elected as senator or representative in the Congress of the United States and to state offices. The secretary of state shall issue certificates of election to those elected to the office of judge of the superior court in judicial districts comprising more than one county and to those elected to either branch of the state legislature in legislative districts comprising more than one county.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1315; 1965 c 9 s 29.27.110. Prior: (i) 1933 c 92 s 1; RRS s 5343-1. (ii) Code 1881 s 3100, part; No RRS. Formerly RCW 29.27.110.]

NOTES:

Judges of their own election and qualification—Quorum: State Constitution Art. 2 s 8.

Returns of elections, canvass, etc.: State Constitution Art. 3 s 4.